Hawaii statutes.
§105-1 Government motor vehicles; certain
uses prohibited. Except as provided in section 105-2, it shall be unlawful
for any person to use, operate, or drive any motor vehicle owned or controlled
by the State, or by any county thereof, for personal pleasure or personal use
(as distinguished from official or governmental service or use) including,
without limitation to the generality of the foregoing, travel by or conveyance
of any officer or employee of the State, or of any county thereof, directly or indirectly,
from his place of service or from his work to or near his place of abode, or,
directly or indirectly, from such place of abode to his place of service or to
his work. [L 1919, c 227, pt of §1; RL 1945, pt of §462; am L 1949, c 389, pt
of §1(a); RL 1955, §7-10; HRS §105-1]

Attorney General Opinions

State may hold employee responsible for negligent damage to
vehicle under the employee's control. Att. Gen. Op. 63-31.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next